Maryland, session 2025, HB1312.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
14–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1312*

HOUSE BILL 1312
(c) “Partition by sale” means a court–ordered sale of property, whether by
auction, sealed bids, or open–market sale conducted under § 14–711 of this subtitle.
14–703.
(A) In an action under this subtitle, the court on its own motion or on motion of
any party may issue an order:
(1) For the appointment of an attorney to protect the interest of any party
to the same extent and effect as provided under Rule 2–203 of the Maryland Rules with
respect to individuals not in being;
(2) To require joinder of any additional parties that are necessary or
proper; and
(3) To require that the plaintiff:
(i) Procure a title report supported by an affidavit by the person
making the title search that a complete search of the public records has been performed in
accordance with generally accepted standards of title examination for the appropriate
period as determined by the court, but not less than 60 years; and
(ii) Designate a place where the title report shall be kept for
inspection, use, and copying by the parties.
(B) (1) IF A PLAINTIFF DOES NOT PROCURE A TITLE REPORT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A)(3) OF THIS SECTION, EACH PARTY SHALL
TIMELY NOTIFY THE COURT OF THE TYPE AND AMOUNT OF EACH OUTSTANDING LIEN
ON THE PROPERTY THAT THE PARTY KNOWS OR SHOULD KNOW OF, INCLUDING ANY
MORTGAGE, DEED OF TRUST, TAX LIEN, AND JUDGMENT LIEN.
(2) THE NOTICE TO THE COURT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCLUDE SUPPORTING DOCUMENTATION FOR EACH OUTSTANDING LIEN ON THE
PROPERTY AND THE AMOUNT OWED.
14–708.
(a) If any cotenant requested partition by sale, after the determination of value
under § 14–707 of this subtitle, the court shall send notice to the parties that any cotenant,
except a cotenant that requested partition by sale, may buy all the interests of the cotenants
that requested partition by sale.
(c) The purchase price for each of the interests of a cotenant that requested
partition by sale is the PRODUCT OF:

HOUSE BILL 1312 3
(1) THE value of the entire parcel determined under § 14–707 of this
subtitle [multiplied by the] MINUS THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF EACH OUTSTANDING LIEN
ON THE PROPERTY, INCLUDING ANY MORTGAGE, DEED OF TRUST, TAX LIEN, AND
JUDGMENT LIEN; AND
(2) THE cotenant’s fractional ownership of the entire parcel.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any partition action filed before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.